Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 5. Planning

Cross references. —

As to zoning, see §§

15-1-601

to

15-1-611

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming's Local Governments and the Quality of Growth — A Preliminary Discussion,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 491 (1979).

§ 15-1-501.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this article:

“Commission” means the planning commission authorized by W.S.

15-1-502

;

“Street” includes streets, highways, avenues, boulevards, parkways, roads, lanes, walks, alleys, viaducts, subways, tunnels, bridges, public easements and rights-of-way and other ways;

“Subdivision” means the division of a tract or parcel of land into three (3) or more parts for immediate or future sale or building development.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 71; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-71; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-601

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Quoted

in

Ahearn v. Town of Wheatland, 2002 WY 12, 39 P.3d 409,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 2002).

Law reviews. —

As to the development of land use planning in Wyoming, see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 73 (1977).

§ 15-1-502.
Commission authorized; organization and procedure; compensation; staff; consultants; expenditures.

Each city and town may have a planning commission. The number and terms of the members and any other details relating to its organization and procedure shall be determined by the governing body. The members shall be appointed by the mayor with the consent of the governing body and shall serve without compensation, except for reasonable expenses. The commission may appoint employees and staff necessary for its work and may contract with city planners and other consultants, including any appropriate agencies or departments of the state of Wyoming, for any service it requires. Commission expenditures shall not exceed the amount of funds appropriated by the governing body or obtained through gifts or otherwise.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 72; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-72; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-602

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1984, ch. 34, § 2.

Cited

in

Coulter v. City of Rawlins, 662 P.2d 888,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1983).

§ 15-1-503.
Master plan; adoption; concurrent action; contents; amendment.

The commission, after holding public hearings, shall adopt and certify to the governing body a master plan for the physical development of the municipality. If the plan involves territory outside the city or town, action shall be taken with the concurrence of the board of county commissioners or county planning commission, or other municipal legislative body concerned. The master plan, with the accompanying maps, plats, charts and descriptive and explanatory matter shall show the:

Commission’s recommendations for the development and may include the general location, character and extent of streets, bridges, viaducts, parks, waterways and waterfront developments, playgrounds, airports and other public ways, grounds, places and spaces;

General location of public buildings and other public property;

General location and extent of public utilities and terminals, whether publicly or privately owned, for water, light, power, heat, sanitation, transportation, communication and other purposes;

Acceptance, widening, removal, extension, relocation, narrowing, vacation, abandonment, or change of use of any public ways, grounds, places, spaces, buildings, properties, utilities or terminals;

Zoning plan for the regulation of the height, area, bulk, location and use of private and public structures and premises, and of population density;

General location, character, layout and extent of community centers and neighborhood units; and

General character, extent and layout of the replanning of blighted districts and slum areas.

The commission may amend, extend or add to the plan or carry any part or subject matter into greater detail.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 73; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-73; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-603

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Park-land dedication ordinances. —

The broad powers delegated by the legislature can fairly encompass the power to adopt a park-land dedication ordinance. A city can require the payment of a sum in lieu of park-land dedication in order to lessen the impact and pressure on park facilities that results from the influx of inhabitants caused by a new development. The limitation on this power is the requirement that any fees collected in lieu of land dedication must be earmarked to accounts for the purpose of acquiring needed park land and maintenance of existing park facilities. Coulter v. Rawlins, 662 P.2d 888,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1983).

Cited

in

Snake River Brewing Co. v. Town of Jackson, 2002 WY 11, 39 P.3d 397,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2002).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “County and Municipal Flood Plain Zoning Under Existing Wyoming Legislation,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 103 (1972).

§ 15-1-504.
Master plan; preparatory surveys and studies; general purpose.

In preparing the master plan, the commission shall make careful and comprehensive surveys and studies of the existing conditions and probable future growth of the municipality and its environs. The plan shall be made for the general purpose of guiding and accomplishing a coordinated, adjusted and harmonious development of the municipality which will best promote the general welfare as well as efficiency and economy in the process of development.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 74; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-74; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-604

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Quoted

in

Snake River Brewing Co. v. Town of Jackson, 2002 WY 11, 39 P.3d 397,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2002).

§ 15-1-505.
Master plan; manner of adopting generally; certification thereof.

The commission may adopt the master plan in parts as the plan progresses or as a whole. Any part of the plan shall correspond generally with one (1) or more of the functional subdivisions of the subject matter thereof. The adoption of the plan or any part, amendment or addition shall be by resolution carried by the affirmative vote of not less than a majority of the commission. The resolution shall refer expressly to the maps, descriptive matter and other matters intended by the commission to form the whole or part of the plan. The action taken shall be recorded on the adopted plan or part thereof over the signature of the secretary of the commission. A copy of the plan or part thereof shall be certified to the governing body.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 75; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-75; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-605

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-1-506.
Master plan; construction to conform, be approved; overruling disapproval; time limitation.

If the governing body has adopted the master plan or any part thereof, no street, park or other public way, ground, place or space, public building or structure or public utility, whether publicly or privately owned, may be constructed until its location and extent conform to the plan and have been approved by the commission. If disapproved, the commission shall communicate its reasons to the governing body which by a vote of not less than a majority of its membership may overrule the disapproval. If overruled, the governing body or the appropriate board or officer may proceed. However, if the public way, ground, place, space, building, structure or utility is one which the governing body, or other body or official of the municipality may not authorize or finance, then the submission to the commission shall be by the board or official having that jurisdiction, and the commission’s disapproval may be overruled by that board by a majority vote or by that official. The acceptance, widening, removal, extension, relocating, narrowing, vacation, abandonment, change of use, acquisition of land for, or sale or lease of any street or other public way, ground, place, property or structure may be similarly overruled.

If the commission fails to act within thirty (30) days after the proposal has been submitted to it, the proposal is deemed approved, unless a longer period is granted by the governing body or other submitting body, board or official.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 76; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-76; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-606

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-1-507.
General powers of commission.

The commission has all powers necessary to perform its functions and promote municipal planning and may:

Make reports and recommendations relating to the plan and development of the municipality to public officials and agencies, other organizations and citizens;

Recommend to the executive or legislative officials programs for public improvement and their financing.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 77; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-77; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-607

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming's Local Governments and the Quality of Growth — A Preliminary Discussion,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 491 (1979).

§ 15-1-508.
Major street plan; official map; contents; procedure; effect; recording ordinance.

After the commission has adopted a major street plan, the governing body may establish an official map of the whole or any part of the existing public streets. The map may also show the location of the lines of streets on plats of subdivisions which the commission has approved. The governing body may make other additions to or modifications of the official map by extending the lines of proposed new streets or street extensions, widenings, narrowings or vacations which have been accurately surveyed and definitely located. Before taking any such action the governing body shall hold a public hearing thereon. Any proposed addition to or modification of the official map shall be submitted to the commission for its approval. If the commission disapproves, approval of the addition or modification then requires an affirmative vote of not less than a majority of the governing body.

The placing of any street or street lines upon the official map does not of itself constitute the opening or establishment of any street or the taking or acceptance of any land for street purposes.

The governing body shall direct that the adopted ordinance creating the official map be recorded in the office of the county clerk.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 78; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-78; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-608

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-1-509.
Major street plan; preserving integrity of map; building permits; necessary findings; specifications.

To preserve the integrity of the official map, the governing body may provide by ordinance, subject to appropriate eminent domain proceeding, that no permit may be issued for any building or structure which encroaches upon land located within the lines of any street as shown on the official map. The ordinance shall provide that the board of adjustment, which the governing body may create by ordinance, has the power, upon an appeal filed with it by the owner of any such land, to authorize a permit for a building or structure within any mapped-street location when it finds that:

The property of the appellant a portion of which lies within the street lines will not yield a reasonable return to the owner unless the permit is granted; or

Balancing the interest of the municipality in preserving the integrity of the official map and the interest of the owner in the use and benefits of the property, the grant of the permit is required by justice and equity.

Before taking any action, the board shall hold a public hearing thereon. If the board decides to authorize a building permit, it may specify the exact location, ground area, height and other details and conditions of extent and character and also the duration of the building or structure to be permitted.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 79; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-79; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-609

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-1-510.
Major street plan; subdivision plats; approval required; preparation and adoption of governing regulations.

If any commission adopts a major street plan and certifies it to the governing body, no plat of a subdivision of land lying within the municipality may be filed or recorded in the office of the county clerk until it has been submitted to and approved by the governing body and its approval entered in writing on the plat by the clerk of the governing body. No county clerk may file or record a plat of a subdivision without approval by the governing body and any unapproved filing or recording is void.

The commission shall prepare regulations governing the subdivision of land within the municipality. The governing body may adopt the regulations for the municipality after a public hearing thereon.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 80; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-80; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-610

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1993, ch. 31, § 1.

Quoted

in

Town of Wheatland v. Allison, 577 P.2d 1006,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 288

(Wyo. 1978); Ahearn v. Town of Wheatland, 2002 WY 12, 39 P.3d 409,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 2002).

§ 15-1-511.
Major street plan; subdivision plats; when penalty for not preparing; exception; enforcement.

Subject to appropriate eminent domain proceedings, if anyone transfers or sells any land located within any area for which a major street plan has been adopted by the commission and the governing body, except for land located in a recorded subdivision, without first preparing a subdivision plat and having it approved by the commission and governing body and recorded in the office of the county clerk, he shall pay a penalty of one hundred dollars ($100.00) for each lot transferred or sold. The description by metes and bounds in the instrument of transfer or other document used in the process of selling or transferring does not exempt the transaction from such penalties. The municipality may enjoin the transfer or sale or may recover the penalty by civil action.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 81; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-81; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-611

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Quoted

in

Ahearn v. Town of Wheatland, 2002 WY 12, 39 P.3d 409,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 2002).

§ 15-1-512.
Violations of provisions deemed misdemeanor; remedies.

Violation of any of the provisions of this article is a misdemeanor. The municipality, or any owner of real estate within the district in which the offending building, structure or land is located, in addition to other remedies provided by law, may institute an injunction, mandamus, abatement or any other appropriate action or proceeding to prevent, enjoin, abate or remove any unlawful erection, construction, alteration, maintenance or use.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 82; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-82; W.S. 1977, § 15-1-612; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.